Florida, session 2026, HB755.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) is added to subsection (1) of
section 255.05, Florida Statutes, to read:
255.05 Bond of contractor constructing public buildings;
form; action by claimants.—
(1) A person entering into a formal contract with the
state or any county, city, or political subdivision thereof, or
other public authority or private entity, for the construction
of a public building, for the prosecution and completion of a
public work, or for repairs upon a public building or public
work shall be required, before commencing the work or before
recommencing the work after a default or abandonment, to execute
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb755 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 755, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
and record in the public records of the county where the
improvement is located, a payment and performance bond with a
surety insurer authorized to do business in this state as
surety. A public entity may not require a contractor to secure a
surety bond under this section from a specific agent or bonding
company.
(h) A person may be exempted from executing the payment
and performance bond required under this subsection if the
following conditions are met:
1. The work is done on property located within an area of
critical state concern which is subject to a long-term ground
lease of 99 years or more with Habitat for Humanity
International, Inc., or any of its local affiliates, at the
discretion of the official or board that owns the subject
underlying property in fee simple.
2. The leasehold interest created by the ground lease of
99 years or more is subject to any claims by claimants who are
lienors as defined in s. 713.01 and applicable lien provisions
in chapter 713. The underlying real property owned by the state,
or any county, city, or political subdivision thereof, or other
public authority is not subject to any lien rights created under
chapter 713.
Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
259.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
259.105 The Florida Forever Act.—
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb755 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 755, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
(3) Less the costs of issuing and the costs of funding
reserve accounts and other costs associated with bonds, the
proceeds of cash payments or bonds issued pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the Florida Forever Trust Fund
created by s. 259.1051. The proceeds shall be distributed by the
Department of Environmental Protection in the following manner:
(b) Thirty-five percent to the Department of Environmental
Protection for the acquisition of lands and capital project
expenditures described in this section. Of the proceeds
distributed pursuant to this paragraph, it is the intent of the
Legislature that an increased priority be given to those
acquisitions which achieve a combination of conservation goals,
including protecting Florida's water resources and natural
groundwater recharge. At a minimum, 3 percent, and no more than
10 percent, of the funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph
shall be spent on capital project expenditures identified during
the time of acquisition which meet land management planning
activities necessary for public access. Beginning in the 2017-
2018 fiscal year and continuing through the 2035-2036 2026-2027
fiscal year, at least $5 million of the funds allocated pursuant
to this paragraph shall be spent on land acquisition within the
Florida Keys Area of Critical State Concern as authorized
pursuant to s. 259.045.
Section 3. Subsection (10) of section 377.24, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb755 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 755, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
377.24 Notice of intention to drill well; permits;
abandoned wells and dry holes.—
(10) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, the
drilling, exploration, or production of oil, gas, or other
petroleum products is prohibited in counties designated as rural
areas of opportunity under s. 288.0656 if the proposed site is
within 10 miles of a national estuarine research reserve. If
such a county also contains an area of critical state concern,
the drilling, exploration, or production of oil, gas, or other
petroleum products is prohibited within 30 miles of a national
estuarine research reserve.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb755 -02-er